Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-378
Insurance; insured described generally; who may claim.

When the description of the insured in the policy is so general that it may comprehend any person or class of persons, he only can claim the benefit of the policy who can show that it was intended to include him.

Laws 1913, c. 154, § 67, p. 423;

R.S.1913, § 3203;

Laws 1919, c. 190, tit. V, art. IV, § 37, p. 603;

C.S.1922, § 7802;

C.S.1929, § 44-337;

R.S.1943, § 44-378.